Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB869.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1507. Nonpublic School and Home Education Program Exemption.--(a) A nonpublic school or home education program in this Commonwealth shall be exempt from the requirements of a declaration by the Governor of disaster emergency under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor) or an order by the Secretary of Health under the laws of this Commonwealth.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 1234567891011121314151617181920 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Home education program." As defined in section 1327.1."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit school, home school group, one-room school, church school or school other than a public school in this Commonwealth wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this article and which meet the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 (relating to civil rights).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0869PN0905 - 2 - 12345678910